Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Chapter 1. Definitions and General Provisions.
The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730, effective January 15, 2018, are identical and added the definition of “Authority”; substituted “Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority” for “Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Board” in the definition of “Board”; substituted “granted” for “issued” in the definition of “Licensed”; added the definition of “Principal stockholder”; and substituted “Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority” for “Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control” in the definition of “Special agent”; and substituted “Authority” for “Board” throughout the section.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 54 and 288 are identical, and twice substituted “21 percent” for “18 percent” in the first sentence and added the second sentence in the definition “Farm winery.”

The 2015 amendment by c. 348 added the definition for “Art instruction studio.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 324 substituted “licensed in accordance with §

54.1-3029

” for “certified in accordance with §

54.1-3029

” in the definition of “Day spa.”

The 2016 amendment by c. 710, in the definition for “Farm winery,” inserted the clause (i) designation and redesignated the second sentence as clause (ii) of the first sentence, inserted
“on land zoned agricultural” twice, added the last three sentences and made related changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 152 inserted the definition for “Historic cinema house.”

The 2017 amendments by cc. 157 and 492 are identical, and inserted the definition for “Commercial lifestyle center.”

The 2017 amendment by c. 160 inserted “including cider” in the first sentence of the definition for “Wine.”

The 2017 amendment by c. 585 inserted the definition for “Municipal golf course.”

The 2017 amendment by c. 741, in the definition for “Bed and breakfast establishment,” added the last sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 337 added the definition for “Internet beer retailer.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 37 and 178 are identical, effective July 1, 2020, and substituted “prohibit” for “have not approved” in the definition for “Low alcohol beverage cooler.”

The 2019 amendment by c. 466, in the definition for “Low alcohol beverage cooler,” inserted clause (i) and the designation for clause (ii); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by c. 628 added the definitions for “Bespoke clothier establishment,” “Coworking establishment,” “Member of a bespoke clothier establishment,” and “Member of a coworking establishment”; in the second paragraph for the definition of “Public place,” substituted “ ‘Public place’ does” for “The term shall”; and in the definition for “Wine,” substituted “Wine” for “The term.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 755 substituted “10 acres” for “25 acres” in the definition for “Commercial lifestyle center.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 1009 inserted the definition for “Culinary lodging resort.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 1010 in the definition for “Resort complex,” added clause (iii) in the first sentence, and added “whether or not contiguous to the licensed premises; if the guest rooms or dwelling units are located on property that is not contiguous to the licensed premises, such guest rooms and dwelling units shall be located within the same locality” at the end of the second sentence.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, and in the definition for “Low alcohol beverage cooler,” deleted clause (ii) at the end of the second sentence, which prohibited sale in certain localities, and deleted the third sentence, which read: “In addition, low alcohol beverage coolers shall not be sold for on-premises consumption other than by mixed beverage licenses.” For effective date, see Editor’s note.

The 2020 amendment by c. 755 substituted “10 acres” for “25 acres” in the definition of “Commercial lifestyle center.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 1010, in the definition for “Resort complex,” added clause (iii) in the first sentence, and added “whether or not contiguous to the licensed premises; if the guest rooms or dwelling units are located on property that is not contiguous to the licensed premises, such guest rooms and dwelling units shall be located within the same locality” at the end of the second sentence.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114, effective July 1, 2020, are identical, and in the definition for “Low alcohol beverage cooler,” deleted clause (ii) at the end of the second sentence, which prohibited sale in certain localities, and deleted the third sentence, which read: “In addition, low alcohol beverage coolers shall not be sold for on-premises consumption other than by mixed beverage licensees.”

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114, effective January 1, 2022, are identical, and deleted the definitions for “Art instruction studio,” “Bespoke clothier establishment,” “Canal boat operator,” “Coworking establishment,” “Day spa,” “Internet wine retailer,” “Meal-assembly kitchen,” “Member of a bespoke clothier establishment,” and “Member of a coworking establishment”; added the definitions for “Bus,” “Delicatessen,” “Drugstore,” “Gourmet oyster house,” “Grocery store” and “Marina store”; inserted “wine and” in the defined term “Internet beer retailer”; in the first paragraph of the definition for “Restaurant,” deleted “beer, or” preceding “wine and beer license”; in the definition for “With or without meals,” substituted “§

4.1-206.3

” for “§

4.1-210

” and made stylistic changes.

Cross references.

As to the Attorney General’s limited authority to institute and conduct criminal prosecutions in the circuit courts of the Commonwealth, see §

2.2-511

.

Law Review.

For comment on Virginia’s dramshop immunity, see 10 G.M.U. L. Rev. 285 (1988).

For article, “Wine Tasting Activities in Virginia: Is America’s First Wine Producing State Destined to Wither on the Vine Due to Overregulation?,” see 23 T.M. Cooley L. Rev. 221 (2006).

For annual survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 339 (2009).

Research References.

Liquor Liability Law (Matthew Bender). Mosher.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2B M.J. Automobiles, § 118; 10B M.J. Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 2, 24; 17 M.J. Statutes, § 60.